Hawaii statutes.
[§710-1069] Misrepresenting a notarized
document in the first degree. (1) A person commits the offense of
misrepresenting a notarized document in the first degree if the person submits
or invites reliance on a document that the person knows has been altered after
the document had been notarized by a notary public in this or any other
jurisdiction, and:

(a) The offense was committed with intent to mislead
a public servant; or

(b) The offense was committed for purpose of
commercial or private financial gain.

(2) Misrepresenting a notarized document in
the first degree is a class C felony. [L 2008, c 175, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next